src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! kaardas+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ kaar%{dØ%}a%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^StrGStem%^StrGStem
!!€ kaardas000000
     Vow _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite %^StrGStem: ;


"%{kgØ%}:g"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{kgØ%}:g <=>
     (%{kØ%}:) _ Vow:  (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^G2: ;
     (%{kØ%}:) _  (HarmDummiesVar) ( %^VOWLower:) %^G2: ;
!! jõgi+N+Sg+Nom: **river / joki**
!!€ jõ{kØ}{kgØ}{back}^G2>i
!!€ jõ0g00>i
!! lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ lu{kgØ}õ{back}^Pen^G2
!!€ lugõ000
 
"%{pbv%}:b"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{pbv%}:b <=> 
   Vow: %{pØ%}: _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^G2: ;
!!tõbi+N+Sg+Nom:
!!€ tõ%{pØ%}%{pbv%}%{back%}%^G2i
!!€ tõ0b00i


!! hammas
!!€ ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ hammas000

"%{bm%}:m"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{bm%}:m <=> _  (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite %^WGStem: ;
 m _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:+| ArchCns:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!!hammas+N+Sg+Nom: __tooth/hammas__
!!€ ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ hammas00000

"%{bm%}:b"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{bm%}:b <=> _  (HarmDummiesVar) %^StrGStem: ;
 m _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:+| ArchCns:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
!!hammas+N+Sg+Gen: __tooth/hammas__
!!€ ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^G2%^WGStem
!!€ hamba000000

"%{bv%}:v"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{bv%}:v <=> _  (HarmDummiesVar) %^WGStem: ;
  _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:+| %{hØ%}:| %{sØ%}:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^WGStem: | %^G1:  ] ;
!!närväs+N+Sg+Nom: __tooth/hammas__
!!€ när%{bv%}ä%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ närväs00000
     Vow: _ (HarmDummiesVar) (%^ÄI2ÄÄ:) %^WGStem: ;
!! leib+N+Sg+Gen: **bread/leipä**
!!€ lei{bv}{front}^ÄI2ÄÄ^WGStem>{aä}
!!€ leev000>ä



"%{dn%}:n"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{dn%}:n <=> # Cns* Vow n (HarmDummiesVar) %> _ [a|ä] q ;
 n _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite %^WGStem: ;
 n _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:+|ArchCns:+| %{hØ%}:| %{sØ%}:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!! kannõĺ+N+Sg+Nom: **kantele**
!!€ kan%{dn%}õ%{lĺ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%^PAL
!!€ kannõĺ0000


"%{dl%}:l"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{dl%}:l <=> # Cns* Vow [l (HarmDummiesVar)|(HarmDummiesVar) l] %> _ [a|ä] q PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!!€ tul%{back%}%>%{dl%}aq%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ tul0%>laq00
!!€ kõnõl%{back%}%>%{dl%}aq%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ kõnõl0%>laq00
    l _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^WGStem: ;
!!€ val%{dl%}%{back%}%^G1%>n
!!€ vall00%>n
   l _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:+) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;


"%{dv%}:v"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{dv%}:v <=> [ %{üv%}: |%{uv%}: ] _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^WGStem: ;
!!€ pü%{üv%}%{dv%}%{front%}%^G1%>et
!!€ püvv00%>et
!!€ lu{uv}{dv}{back}^WGStem>{aä}
!!€ luvv00>a
!!€ sü%{üv%}%{dv%}%{front%}%^G1%>ä
!!€ süvv00%>ä

"VdVToVtV"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 d:t <=> Vow _ Vow (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
!aladu, perädü

!"dTot" 2021-04-08
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! d:t <=> [ s | h ] (HarmDummiesVar|Vow: (HarmDummiesVar) %^WGStem: %^VowRM:) %> _ ;
!    Vow _ (s) (Vow:) (HarmDummiesVar) %^StrD2T: ;
!!!käsi+N+Sg+Par __hand, arm__
!!!€ käd%{front%}%^StrD2T%>t
!!!€ kät00%>t
!!!€ hüdsi%{front%}%^StrD2T%>l
!!!€ hütsi00%>l
!    Vow _ (s) (HarmDummiesVar|[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen:) %^StrGStem: ;


"dTos"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 d:s <=> Vow: _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^D2S: ;


"tTos"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 t:s <=> _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^D2S: ;

"tTod"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 t:d <=>
 Vow _ s (HarmDummiesVar) %^WGStem: ;
         Vow _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:|(HarmDummiesVar) %^WGStem: (%>) :Vow ] ;
!! kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: 
!!€ kaota%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ kaoda000

!2015-09-02 Vow [(%^StrGStem:| CnsInZero: %^WGStem:) (%>) Vow | Vow (%^WGStem:)] %> _ [%> | # | :Vow ] ;
!! There should always be a trigger



" %{dn%}:d"
!! **@RULENAME@**
  %{dn%}:d <=> n _ Vow: (l|%{lĺ%}:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite  %^Pen: %^StrGStem:  ;

!!€ kan%{dn%}õl%{back%}%^Pen%^G2%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ
!!€ kand0l00000%>õ

 n _  (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite %^StrGStem: ;

"j2i"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 j:i <=> :Vow (HarmDummiesVar) %> _ [ # | %- ];

"{kḱg}:g "
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{kḱg%}:g <=> _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite [%^WGStem: | %^G2: ] ;

!! kõiḱ+Pron+Sg+Gen
!!€ kõi%{kØ%}%{kḱg%}%{back%}%^G2%^NoPAL%>%{eõ%}
!!€ kõi0g00%>õ


"k2g"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 k:g <=> [Vow|Cns - [h|k|s]] _ [(HarmDummiesVar)|Vow Cns:+ (HarmDummiesVar)  %^Pen: ] %^G1: ;
!!€ hõrak%{back%}%^G1%>a
!!€ hõrag00%>a
!!$ hõrak%{back%}%^G1%>a
!!$ hõrak00%>a
!!€ kisk%{back%}%^G1%>%{uü%}%>t%{aä%}v
!!€ kis000%>u%>tav

!!€ süküs%{front%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>e
!!€ sügüs000%>e



!"gTok"
!!! **@RULENAME@**
! g:k <=>
!    Vow _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^StrGStem:  ; 
!    Vow _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] ( l | r ) (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
!    Vow _ Vow: (HarmDummiesVar) %^StrGStem: ;

!   Vow _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] [ l | r ] (HarmDummiesVar) %^StrGStem: %^Pen: %^VowRM: ;
!   [t ] (VowInZero:) (HarmDummiesVar) (%^VowRM:) %> _ u ;
!! igä+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ i{kØ}{kgØ}ä{front}^Pen^G4
!!€ ikkä00
!!€ ko%{kg%}õr%{back%}%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ
!!€ kok0r0000%>õ


"bTop"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 b:p <=> 
    Vow _ Vow: (HarmDummiesVar) %^StrGStem: ;

"%{pbv%}:p"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{pbv%}:p <=>
   Vow: %{pØ%}: _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^G4: ;
!!tõbi+N+Sg+Ill:
!!€ tõ%{pØ%}%{pbv%}%{back%}%^G4%>%{eõ%}
!!€ tõpp00%>e


"%{pbØ%}:p"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{pbØ%}:p <=> 
    Vow ( %{pØ%}: ) _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
    %{pØ%}: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: [ %^G3: | %^G4: ] ; 

"%{tdØ%}:t"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{tdØ%}:t <=>
  Vow ( %{tØ%}: ) _ (s) [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^G4:|%^G3:] ;
  Vow ( %{tØ%}: ) _ (s) (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite [%^G4:|%^G3:] ;
    Vow %{tØ%}: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: [%^G4:|%^G3:] ;
    %{tØ%}: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar)  %^Pen: [%^G3: | %^G4: ];

"%{kgØ%}:k"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{kgØ%}:k <=>
    Vow (%{kØ%}: ) _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: [%^G4:| %^StrGStem:] ;
   Vow: (%{kØ%}:) _ (HarmDummiesVar) [ %^G4: | %^G3: | VOWHite %^StrGStem:] ;
!!mägi+N+Sg+Ill:
!!€ mä%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}%{front%}%^G4%>%{eõ%}
!!€ mäkk00%>e
   Vow: (%{kØ%}:) _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar)  %^Pen: [%^G3: | %^G4: ];

!! ### STEM-FINAL CONSONANT LOSS
"s20"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 s:0 <=> [ u: | ü: | a: | ä: ] _ (HarmDummiesVar) (%^VowRM:)  %^CnsRM:  ;
 ![ u: | ü: | a: | ä: ] _ (HarmDummiesVar) (%^VowRM:)  %^WGStem:  ;
!! kirotus+N+Pl+Gen:
!!€ kirotus%{back%}%^CnsRM%>isi
!!€ kirotu000%>isi

         s _ %^TS2S: ;
!! usś+N+Sg+Par **door**
!!€ uss%{back%}%^TS2S%>t
!!€ us000%>t

  s _ (HarmDummiesVar) [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;
!FIXME 2019-05-08  s _  [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;
!FIXME
!! vaśma+V+Inf/mA
!!€ va{sØ}{sś}{back}^VOWRaise^WGStem^PAL>m{aä}
!!€ va0ś0000>ma

"%{bv%}:b"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{bv%}:b <=> 
   [ r| l | n | i] _ [ Vow: | ArchVow: ] ( ArchCns: | ArchCns: Cns ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite  %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
!! närväs+A+Sg+Gen:
!!€ när%{bv%}ä%{sØ%}%{front%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^StrGStem%^WGStem
!!€ närbä0000000
  Vow [ r| l | n | i] _  (HarmDummiesVar)  [ %^G4: | %^G3: | %^G2: |%^StrGStem:]  ;
 Vow _ (s (ArchCns: )) (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite [ %^StrGStem:] ;
 Cns _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite [ %^StrGStem:] ;
 Cns _ Vow: (:Cns+|ArchCns: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite  %^Pen: [ %^StrGStem: ] ;
 [Vow|Cns|ArchVow:] _ (Cns|s (ArchCns: )) [Vow:|ArchVow:] (:Cns+|ArchCns: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite  %^Pen: [ %^StrGStem: ] ;
  _  Vow: (:Cns+|ArchCns: ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite  %^Pen: [ %^StrGStem: ] ;




"%{gØ%}:g"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{gØ%}:g <=> 
    _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite %^StrGStem: ;
!! liig+A+Sg+Nom:
!!€ lii%{gØ%}%{back%}%^StrGStem
!!€ liig00
    _ Vow: (:Cns+|ArchCns:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
!! huug

  Vow [ r| l | n ] _  (HarmDummiesVar)  [ %^G4: | %^G3: | %^G2: |%^StrGStem:]  ;

"d20"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 d:0 <=>
         Vow _ s ([Vow:|ArchVow:]) (HarmDummiesVar) %^TS2S: ;
!!€ hüdsi%{front%}%^TS2S%^VowRM%>te
!!€ hü0s0000%>te
!2019-06-02          Vow: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;

"%{dØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{dØ%}:0 <=>
          _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (ArchCns: |Cns:+|:Cns+ ) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;


"g20"
!! **@RULENAME@** deprication to {gǵØ}:0
 g:0 <=> [Cns: - [n:]|Vow:]  _ (HarmDummiesVar)  %^WGStem: ;
!!€ aig%{back%}%^WGStem%>o
!!€ a0000%>o
   [Cns: - [n:]|Vow:] _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar)|(HarmDummiesVar) %{eõ%}:] PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!! argnõma+V+Inf
!!€ ar%{gØ%}{back}{eõ}^Pen^WGStem>d{aä}q
!!€ ar00õ00>daq

"%{gØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{gØ%}:0 <=> [Cns: - [n:]|Vow:]  _ (HarmDummiesVar)  %^WGStem: ;
!!€ aig{back}^WGStem>o
!!€ a0000>o
   [Cns: - [n:]|Vow:] _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:|ArchCns:) (HarmDummiesVar)|(HarmDummiesVar) %{eõ%}:] PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!! igä+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ i{kØ}{kgØ}ä{front}^Pen^G1
!!€ i00ä000
!! lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc **read/lukea**
!!€ lu{kgØ}õ{back}^Pen^VOWLower^Pen^WGStem^VowRM>e>t
!!€ lo00000000>e>t
!! argnõma+V+Inf
!!€ ar{gØ}{back}{eõ}^Pen^WGStem>d{aä}q
!!€ ar00õ00>daq


!2017-02-03 Vow l _ Vow (HarmDummiesVar) %^WGStem: ;
!!€ palgõ%{back%}%^WGStem%>h
!!€ pal0õ00%>h

"{gǵØ}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{gǵØ%}:0 <=> [Cns: - [n:]|Vow:]  _ (HarmDummiesVar)  %^WGStem: ;
!! särǵ+N+Sg+Gen: **roach/särki**
!!€ sär{gǵØ}{front}^WGStem^NoPAL>%{eõ%}
!!€ sär0000>e

"{gǵØ}:g"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{gǵØ%}:g <=> n _ (HarmDummiesVar)  %^WGStem: %^NoPAL: ;
              [Cns|Vow] _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite %^StrGStem: %^NoPAL: ;
!! särǵ+N+Sg+Ill: **roach/särki**
!!€ sär{gǵØ}{front}^StrGStem^NoPAL>%{eõ%}
!!€ särg000>e
     [Cns|Vow] _ Vow: (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^StrGStem: %^Pen: %^NoPAL: ;


"%{pbv%}:v"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{pbv%}:v <=> 
   Vow: %{pØ%}: _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^G1: ;
   Vow: %{pØ%}: _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^WGStem: ;
!!tõbi+N+Sg+Gen:
!!€ tõ%{pØ%}%{pbv%}%{back%}%^G1%>%{eõ%}
!!€ tõ0v00%>õ


"%{pbØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{pbØ%}:0 <=>
     %{pØ%}: _ Vow  (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^G1: ;
! Vow ( %{pØ%}: ) _ Vow  (HarmDummiesVar) [PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^WGStem:|%^G1:] ;
 

"%{tdØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{tdØ%}:0 <=>
         Vow _ s [ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite %^Pen:| (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite] %^G1:  ;
!!€ hüdsi%{front%}%^TS2S%^VowRM%>te
!!€ hü0s0000%>te
          Vow:  _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) (PenVOWHite|VOWHite) %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite ] %^G1: ;
          Vow: %{tØ%}:  _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) (PenVOWHite|VOWHite) %^Pen:|(HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite ] %^G1: ;


"%{kgØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{kgØ%}:0 <=> 
   Vow: _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) ((%^Pen:) %^VOWLower:) %^Pen:| (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite ] %^WGStem: ;
    Vow: %{kØ%}: _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^G1: ;
!!mägi+N+Sg+Gen: __hill/mäki__
!!€ mä%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}%{front%}%^G1%>%{eõ%}
!!€ mä0000%>e

   %{kØ%}: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummiesVar) ((%^Pen:) %^VOWLower:) %^Pen: %^G1: ;

!!€ u%{jØ%}jo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>m%{aä%}
!!€ u0jo000%>ma


"Disallow %^ErrorBack:0 in BHARM"
%^ErrorBack: /<= BHARM _ ;





!!TESTS
!echo 'v a s t a l i {back}:0 > n {eõ}:õ' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'vallalinõ+A+Sg+Nom' | hfst-lookup src/fst/lexicon.hfst
!echo 'k a u {pb}:p {õØ}:0 {lĺ}:l {back}:0 ^Pen:0 ^VOWRaise:0 ^Pen:0 ^StrGStem:0 ^Pen:0 ^VowRM:0 > {eõ}:õ > m {aä}:a ' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst

!OLD


!! püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ pü%{üv%}%{dd́v%}%{front%}%^PAL
!!€ püüd́00


!! pereq
!!€ pe%{rØ%}re%{front%}%^WGStem%>h
!!€ pe0re00%>h

!! naŕma
!!€ na%{rØ%}%{rŕ%}%{back%}%^CC2C%^PAL%>m%{aä%}
!!€ na0r000%>ma


!! ### Other marks
!FIXME
!!€ ki%{pb%}õ%{nń%}%{back%}%>a
!!€ kipõn0%>a

!"mToZero"
!! **@RULENAME@**
! m:0 <=> m_ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;

!"vToZero"
!! **@RULENAME@**
! v:0 <=> v_ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
